test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: tráður
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: tráð
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [tráð, tráði, træðri]
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: tráðar
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: træðrir
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: træðrir
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [tráðum, træðrum]
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: tráða
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: tráðurin
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: tráðin
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [tráðnum, tráðinum, træðrinum]
    tráður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: tráðarins
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: træðrirnir
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: træðrirnar
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [tráðunum, træðrunum]
    tráður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: tráðanna
